Nevada, session 83, SB51.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 319 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Account for Housing Expansion Through
Local Partnerships is hereby created in the State General Fund.
The Division shall administer the Account.
2. The Division may accept grants, gifts, donations or other
sources of money for deposit in the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account. All claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
5. Money in the Account must be used only to reimburse
cities and counties for the cost of reducing or subsidizing impact
fees, fees for the issuance of building permits or fees imposed for
the purpose for which an enterprise fund was created to assist in
maintaining or developing a project for affordable housing
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 278.235. All
distributions from the Account must be approved by the Interim
-
*SB51*

– 3 –
Finance Committee in accordance with section 3 of this act before
such distributions are made.
Sec. 3. 1. A county or city may request reimbursement from
the Account for Housing Expansion Through Local Partnerships.
The request must:
(a) Be made to the Division in such form as the Division
prescribes.
(b) Be for an amount not to exceed the actual cost to the
county or city to reduce or subsidize impact fees, fees for the
issuance of building permits or fees imposed for the purpose for
which an enterprise fund was created to assist in maintaining or
developing a project for affordable housing pursuant to paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 of NRS 278.235.
(c) Include proof:
(1) Of the cost to the city or county to reduce or subsidize
impact fees, fees for the issuance of building permits or fees
imposed for the purpose for which an enterprise fund was created
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 278.235;
(2) That the requirements of subsection 2 of NRS 278.235
were met; and
(3) That a certificate of occupancy has been issued for the
project for affordable housing for which fees were reduced or
subsidized.
2. The Division shall review each request for a
reimbursement submitted pursuant to subsection 1. If the Division
determines that a request should be approved, the Division shall
submit a request to the State Board of Examiners for an allocation
by the Interim Finance Committee from the Account. The State
Board of Examiners shall consider the request, may require from
the requester such additional information as they deem
appropriate, and shall, if it finds that an allocation from the
Account should be made, recommend the amount of the allocation
to the Interim Finance Committee for its independent evaluation
and action. The Interim Finance Committee is not bound to follow
the recommendation of the State Board of Examiners.
3. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that a transfer
recommended by the Division and the State Board of Examiners
should and may lawfully be made, the Committee shall by
resolution establish the amount and direct the State Controller to
transfer that amount to the county or city that submitted the
request. The State Controller shall thereupon make the transfer.
Sec. 4. NRS 218E.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.405 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Interim Finance Committee may exercise the powers conferred
-
*SB51*

– 4 –
upon it by law only when the Legislature is not in a regular or
special session.
2. During a regular or special session, the Interim Finance
Committee may also perform the duties imposed on it by NRS
228.1111, subsection 5 of NRS 284.115, NRS 285.070, subsection 2
of NRS 321.335, NRS 322.007, subsection 2 of NRS 323.020, NRS
323.050, subsection 1 of NRS 323.100, subsection 3 of
NRS 341.126, NRS 341.142, paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS
341.145, subsection 3 of NRS 349.073, NRS 353.220, 353.224,
353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive, 353.288, 353.335, 353.3375,
353C.224, 353C.226, paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of NRS
407.0762, NRS 428.375, 433.732, 439.4905, 439.620, 439.630,
445B.830, subsection 1 of NRS 445C.320 and NRS 538.650 [.] and
section 3 of this act. In performing those duties, the Senate Standing
Committee on Finance and the Assembly Standing Committee on
Ways and Means may meet separately and transmit the results of
their respective votes to the Chair of the Interim Finance Committee
to determine the action of the Interim Finance Committee as a
whole.
3. The Chair of the Interim Finance Committee may appoint a
subcommittee consisting of six members of the Committee to
review and make recommendations to the Committee on matters of
the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration that require prior approval of the Interim Finance
Committee pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 341.126, NRS 341.142
and paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 341.145. If the Chair
appoints such a subcommittee:
(a) The Chair shall designate one of the members of the
subcommittee to serve as the chair of the subcommittee;
(b) The subcommittee shall meet throughout the year at the
times and places specified by the call of the chair of the
subcommittee; and
(c) The Director or the Director’s designee shall act as the
nonvoting recording secretary of the subcommittee.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Account for Housing Expansion Through Local
Partnerships created by section 2 of this act the sum of $20,000,000
to reimburse cities and counties pursuant to section 3 of this act for
the cost of reducing or subsidizing impact fees, fees for the issuance
of building permits or fees imposed for the purpose for which an
enterprise fund was created pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 278.235.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB51*